Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2227.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Martin J. Kupchella Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Martin J. Kupchella was born April 14, 1920, in Nanty Glo, Cambria County.(2) Mr. Kupchella was employed as a coal miner before becoming inducted into the United States Army during World War II.(3) During his time with the Army, Mr. Kupchella saw action in Normandy, Northern France, Rhineland, Ardennes, Northern Apennines and Central Europe.(4) On December 17, 1944, near Honengen, Belgium, Mr. Kupchella volunteered to act as leader on a towed anti-tank gun while under enemy fire and, when his platoon leader was wounded, he ran into an open field to free a bogged-down vehicle so that he could get the platoon leader to safety.(5) Mr. Kupchella's actions, courage, initiative and 20260HB2227PN3749 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031323334353637383940 devotion to duty during that battle earned him the Silver Star Medal, which is the United States Armed Forces' third-highest military decoration for valor in combat.(6) Mr. Kupchella was also awarded the Good Conduct Medal, the European African Middle Eastern Service Medal and six Bronze Star Medals for his service during World War II.(7) Upon returning home to Nanty Glo after the war, Mr. Kupchella became active in his community as a member of VFW Post 3489, Holy Name Society, American Legion Post 619 and Coal Country Auto Club and as a member of the Knights of Columbus Council 522 in Ebensburg.(8) Mr. Kupchella passed away January 5, 2000, at 79 years of age.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 68687, carrying Pennsylvania Route 271 over a tributary of Blacklick Creek in Blacklick Township, Cambria County, is designated as the Martin J. Kupchella Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.SECTION 2. WORLD WAR II VETERAN PVT. WILBUR RUSSELL REA MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) WILBUR RUSSELL REA, BORN IN IRVONA ON MAY 1, 1924, WAS THE SON OF HERBERT BLOOM REA AND MARY ELIZABETH BONE REA.(2) PVT. REA GRADUATED FROM COALPORT IRVONA HIGH SCHOOL.(3) PVT. REA ENJOYED WORKING ON CARS AND FARM EQUIPMENT.(4) PVT. REA ENTERED THE SERVICE UNDER THE UNITED STATES ARMY'S 96TH DIVISION, COMPANY B, 381ST INFANTRY.20260HB2227PN3749 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) PVT. REA WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON APRIL 16, 1945, IN OKINAWA, JAPAN.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 69488, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 3005 OVER NORTH WITMER RUN IN IRVONA BOROUGH, CLEARFIELD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE WORLD WAR II VETERAN PVT. WILBUR RUSSELL REA MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 3. PFC RAYMOND LEE MCGARVEY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) RAYMOND LEE MCGARVEY WAS BORN MAY 7, 1946, IN BERWINSDALE, JORDAN TOWNSHIP, CLEARFIELD COUNTY.(2) RAYMOND GRADUATED FROM BECCARIA-COALPORT-IRVONA HIGH SCHOOL IN COALPORT BOROUGH, CLEARFIELD COUNTY.(3) OUTSIDE OF SCHOOL, RAYMOND WAS ACTIVE IN FUTURE FARMERS OF AMERICA AND 4-H CLUB. HE ENJOYED SPENDING TIME WITH HIS PARENTS, WALTER E. AND EVELYN MCGARVEY.(4) PFC MCGARVEY ENTERED THE SERVICE OF THE UNITED STATES ARMY UNDER THE 25TH DIVISION, 3RD BRIGADE, 35TH INFANTRY.(5) PFC MCGARVEY EARNED MANY DECORATIONS, INCLUDING THE COMBAT INFANTRYMAN BADGE, BRONZE STAR WITH VALOR, PURPLE HEART, NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL AND THE VIETNAM CROSS OF GALLANTRY WITH PALM UNIT CITATION.(6) ON JULY 3, 1966, PFC MCGARVEY WAS KILLED IN ACTION BY MACHINE GUN FIRE WHILE SERVING ON A SEARCH AND DESTROY MISSION LOCATED IN THE PLEIKU PROVINCE, VIETNAM. HE MADE THE ULTIMATE SACRIFICE AFTER SINGLE-HANDEDLY CHARGING A FORTIFIED 20260HB2227PN3749 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MACHINE GUN POSITION TO DEFEND HIS COMRADES AGAINST ENEMY FIRE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 11527, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 729 OVER GAZZAM RUN IN JORDAN TOWNSHIP, CLEARFIELD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC RAYMOND LEE MCGARVEY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 4. PRIVATE FIRST CLASS BRUCE A. COBB MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) BRUCE A. COBB WAS BORN JUNE 27, 1949, IN BRADFORD, MCKEAN COUNTY.(2) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS SERVING WITH COMPANY I, 3RD BATTALION, 7TH MARINE REGIMENT.(3) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON MARCH 25, 1968, IN QUANG NAM PROVINCE, VIETNAM.(4) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB WAS AWARDED SEVERAL MEDALS DURING HIS SERVICE AND POSTHUMOUSLY, INCLUDING: THE COMBAT ACTION RIBBON, THE NAVY PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION, THE VIETNAM SERVICE MEDAL, THE VIETNAM CIVIL ACTIONS UNIT CITATION, THE NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL, THE REPUBLIC OF VIETNAM GALLANTRY CROSS UNIT CITATION, THE REPUBLIC OF VIETNAM CAMPAIGN MEDAL AND THE PURPLE HEART.(5) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB IS BURIED IN THE WILLOW DALE CEMETERY IN BRADFORD, MCKEAN COUNTY.(6) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB'S NAME IS ENSHRINED ON THE VIETNAM WAR MEMORIAL, IN WASHINGTON, DC, AT PANEL 46E, LINE 20260HB2227PN3749 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 15.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 25406, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 346 OVER WILLOW CREEK IN CORYDON TOWNSHIP, MCKEAN COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PRIVATE FIRST CLASS BRUCE A. COBB MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 5. SERGEANT EDWARD VERNON MCCHESSNEY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) EDWARD VERNON MCCHESSNEY WAS BORN JANUARY 21, 1930, IN ALTOONA.(2) SERGEANT MCCHESSNEY GRADUATED FROM ALTOONA HIGH SCHOOL IN 1947 AFTER COMPLETING THE PLUMBING AND WELDING PROGRAM.(3) SERGEANT MCCHESSNEY WAS ONE OF 17 CHILDREN AND, IN 1930, RESIDED WITH HIS SISTER, GERALDINE SHADLE, AT THE HOME OF THEIR GRANDPARENTS, WILLIAM AND IDA EDWARDS SHADLE, IN HUSTON TOWNSHIP, BLAIR COUNTY.(4) SERGEANT MCCHESSNEY SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE DURING THE KOREAN WAR, ATTAINING THE RANK OF SERGEANT IN THE 5TH BOMB SQUADRON, STATIONED AT TRAVIS AIR FORCE BASE IN FAIRFIELD, CALIFORNIA.(5) SERGEANT MCCHESSNEY DIED ON MARCH 28, 1952, IN FORT WAYNE, INDIANA, AS THE RESULT OF AN AUTOMOBILE ACCIDENT WHILE RETURNING TO BASE AFTER VISITING HIS PARENTS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 5662, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 866 OVER THE FRANKSTOWN BRANCH OF THE JUNIATA RIVER IN CATHARINE TOWNSHIP, BLAIR COUNTY, IS 20260HB2227PN3749 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DESIGNATED AS THE SERGEANT EDWARD VERNON MCCHESSNEY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 6. GERALD REITER AND LEON HAHN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) GERALD ANDREW REITER WAS BORN FEBRUARY 12, 1948, IN NATRONA HEIGHTS. LEON HENRY HAHN WAS BORN MAY 12, 1946, IN MCKEES ROCK.(2) PFC REITER ATTENDED WEST BRANCH HIGH SCHOOL AND SGT. HAHN ATTENDED COOPER TOWNSHIP HIGH SCHOOL.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, BOTH PFC REITER AND SGT. HAHN WERE ACTIVE MEMBERS AT THE SHEPHERD OF THE HILLS LUTHERAN CHURCH.(4) PFC REITER ENLISTED IN THE MARINES IN 1966. PFC REITER WAS DEPLOYED TO VIETNAM WITH THE 5TH BATTALION. HE RECEIVED TWO PURPLE HEARTS.(5) PFC REITER WAS WOUNDED BY A LAND MINE IN OCTOBER 1966. UPON RECOVERY FROM HIS INJURIES, PFC REITER RETURNED TO ACTION. PFC REITER WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON MAY 12, 1967, FROM HOSTILE FIRE WHILE ON AN OPERATION IN THE VICINITY OF QUANG TIN, VIETNAM.(6) SGT. HAHN SERVED IN THE MARINES, LOGISTICS SUPPORT GROUP ALPHA 3RD SERVICE BATTALION FORCE LOGISTICS COMMAND. SGT. HAHN WAS STATIONED IN HUE, VIETNAM, ON THE "FUEL FARM."(7) SGT. HAHN WAS UNLOADING CONTAMINATED FUEL WHEN AN EXPLOSION OCCURRED, CAUSING HIM TO BE SEVERELY INJURED. HE WAS TRANSFERRED TO YOKOHAMA, JAPAN, WHERE HE PASSED AWAY ON MAY 16, 1968.20260HB2227PN3749 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 11669, CARRYING QUEHANNA HIGHWAY OVER MOSQUITO CREEK, KARTHAUS TOWNSHIP, CLEARFIELD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE GERALD REITER AND LEON HAHN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 7. ASHLEY E. WOOLRIDGE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ASHLEY E. WOOLRIDGE WAS BORN NOVEMBER 8, 1916.(2) MR. WOOLRIDGE ATTENDED CLEARFIELD PUBLIC SCHOOL, WHERE HE GRADUATED IN 1934.(3) MR. WOOLRIDGE THEN ATTENDED WEST POINT MILITARY ACADEMY FROM 1934 TO 1935.(4) MR. WOOLRIDGE RECEIVED HIS BACHELOR OF SCIENCE DEGREE FROM LOCK HAVEN STATE TEACHERS COLLEGE IN 1939 AND THEN ATTENDED PENN STATE COLLEGE GRADUATE SCHOOL, WHERE HE WAS ENROLLED IN THE MASTER'S PROGRAM IN EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION BEFORE BEING CALLED INTO SERVICE IN 1941.(5) OUTSIDE OF WORK, MR. WOOLRIDGE ENJOYED HIS FAMILY, HORSES, FLYING, THE MOUNTAINS, HUNTING AND FISHING.(6) MR. WOOLRIDGE ALSO MINED SURFACE COAL FOR OVER 50 YEARS AND TAUGHT RELATED MATHEMATICS, SCIENCE AND ENGLISH AT HANOVER HIGH SCHOOL.(7) MR. WOOLRIDGE COMPLETED U.S. ARMY AIR CORPS (USAAC) FLYING SCHOOL IN JULY 1942, COMMISSIONED AS A SECOND LIEUTENANT AS A RATED PILOT IN THE USAAC.(8) MR. WOOLRIDGE WENT OVERSEAS DURING SEPTEMBER 1943 AS PILOT AND FLIGHT LEADER IN THE 319TH BOMBARDMENT GROUP AND 20260HB2227PN3749 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FLEW A MARTIN B-26 MARAUDER.(9) THROUGHOUT HIS SERVICE, MR. WOOLRIDGE WOULD FLY THE NORTH ATLANTIC (LABRADOR, GREENLAND, ICELAND AND ENGLAND), AFRICA DURING AN INVASION IN NOVEMBER 1942, SARDINIA, CORSICA AND FRANCE.(10) MR. WOOLRIDGE WAS PLACED IN COMMAND OF THE 320TH BOMBARDMENT GROUP IN THE 12TH AIR FORCE ON NOVEMBER 1, 1944, AND THEN PROMOTED TO COLONEL IN FEBRUARY 1945 AFTER 106 COMBAT MISSIONS.(11) MR. WOOLRIDGE WAS HONORABLY DISCHARGED IN NOVEMBER 1945.(12) MR. WOOLRIDGE EARNED DECORATIONS SUCH AS THE SILVER STAR, DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS WITH TWO CLUSTERS, AIR MEDAL WITH 23 CLUSTERS, PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION WITH TWO CLUSTERS AND TWO CROIX DE GUERRE AVEC PALME.(13) MR. WOOLRIDGE PASSED AWAY ON MAY 3, 2004, AT A HOSPITAL IN PITTSBURGH.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 52427, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 970 OVER THE WEST BRANCH OF THE SUSQUEHANNA RIVER IN BRADFORD TOWNSHIP, CLEARFIELD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE ASHLEY E. WOOLRIDGE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 8. PFC RICHARD F. "RICKY" RITTER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) PFC RICHARD FRANK RITTER WAS BORN OCTOBER 7, 1944, IN WILLIAMSPORT.(2) PFC RITTER GRADUATED FROM WARRIOR RUN HIGH SCHOOL.20260HB2227PN3749 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) PFC RITTER ENTERED THE MARINES AND WAS A PART OF COMPANY A, FIRST ENGINEERING BATTALION, THIRD MARINE DIVISION.(4) PFC RITTER WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON MARCH 15, 1967, NEAR DA NANG, VIETNAM.(5) PFC RITTER RECEIVED THE PURPLE HEART POSTHUMOUSLY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE SECTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 405 FROM SEGMENT 0270/OFFSET 2380 TO SEGMENT 220/OFFSET 2306 ON PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 44 IN DELAWARE TOWNSHIP AND WATSONTOWN BOROUGH IN NORTHUMBERLAND COUNTY IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC RICHARD F. "RICKY" RITTER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 9. SGT. ALLAN R. BEVINGTON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ALLAN R. BEVINGTON WAS BORN DECEMBER 25, 1983, IN BEAVER FALLS.(2) SGT. BEVINGTON GRADUATED FROM BEAVER FALLS HIGH SCHOOL IN 2002, WHERE HE PLAYED BASEBALL AND FOOTBALL.(3) WHILE STILL IN HIGH SCHOOL, SGT. BEVINGTON ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY AS A COMBAT ENGINEER.(4) OUTSIDE OF WORK, SGT. BEVINGTON LOVED SPENDING TIME HUNTING AND FISHING, AND DURING HIS FIRST LEAVE FROM THE ARMY, SGT. BEVINGTON PURCHASED A 2002 FORD MUSTANG GT, WHICH WAS HIS DREAM CAR.(5) SGT. BEVINGTON DISPLAYED GREAT DEDICATION AND SKILL WITHIN HIS FIRST AND ONLY UNIT, BRAVO COMPANY 40TH ENGINEERS 1ST ARMORED DIVISION, STATIONED IN BAUMHOLDER, GERMANY.20260HB2227PN3749 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) WHILE DEPLOYED ON HIS FIRST TOUR IN IRAQ, SGT. BEVINGTON WAS QUICKLY PROMOTED TO THE RANK OF SERGEANT AS A RESULT OF HIS LEADERSHIP.(7) SGT. BEVINGTON WAS AWARDED THE PURPLE HEART AND BRONZE STAR FOR DEFENDING HIS UNIT ON HIS FIRST DEPLOYMENT AND WAS AWARDED THE SILVER STAR ON HIS LAST DEPLOYMENT.(8) SGT. BEVINGTON WAS SENT TO SPECIAL TRAINING AS A SAPPER, EARNING THE TITLE AS AN ELITE COMBAT ENGINEER.(9) DURING SGT. BEVINGTON'S LAST TOUR, HIS UNIT WAS PREPARING TO RETURN TO GERMANY IN ONE WEEK.(10) IN PREPARATION FOR CONVOY, SGT. BEVINGTON'S SQUAD WAS SENT ON A PRE-ROUTE INSPECTION, DURING WHICH THEY FOUND AN IED.(11) ON SEPTEMBER 21, 2006, WHILE PREPARING TO DISARM THE IED, THE IED WENT OFF, KILLING SGT. BEVINGTON INSTANTLY AND WOUNDING ANOTHER SOLDIER.(12) SGT. BEVINGTON IS SURVIVED BY HIS MOTHER, BEVERLY BEVINGTON, FATHER, FRANK LAW, BROTHERS, CHARLES (CHUCK) AND ROBERT (BOB) BEVINGTON, NIECES, SARAH SMILEY, CHEALSEY BEVINGTON AND NEPHEW, BROCK BEVINGTON.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 18 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH 37TH STREET TO THE INTERSECTION WITH WALLACE RUN ROAD IN BEAVER FALLS, BEAVER COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SGT. ALLAN R. BEVINGTON MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 10. CPL. MELVIN PHILIP "DUTCH" HENRY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:20260HB2227PN3749 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) MELVIN PHILIP "DUTCH" HENRY WAS BORN NOVEMBER 8, 1906.(2) CPL. HENRY GREW UP IN HOUTZDALE BOROUGH, CLEARFIELD COUNTY. HE ATTENDED PHILIPSBURG-OSCEOLA AREA SCHOOL DISTRICT.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, CPL. HENRY WAS A STUNT MAN AND PARACHUTIST WITH JACK LANGLEY'S FLYING FALCONS.(4) CPL. HENRY SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY AIR CORPS, 1ST AIR CARGO SQUADRON.(5) THROUGHOUT HIS MILITARY CAREER, CPL. HENRY DEMONSTRATED EXCEPTIONAL DEDICATION AND BRAVERY, EARNING THE DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS WITH OAK LEAF CLUSTER AND THE AIR MEDAL WITH TWO OAK LEAF CLUSTERS.(6) ON JUNE 18, 1945, CPL. HENRY WAS REPORTED MISSING-IN-ACTION OVER BURMA, INDIA. A PRESUMPTIVE FINDING OF DEATH WAS ISSUED ON JUNE 19, 1946.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 11231, ON THAT PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 53 OVER THE BEAVER RUN RIVER, HOUTZDALE BOROUGH, CLEARFIELD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE CPL. MELVIN PHILIP "DUTCH" HENRY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 11. STAFF SERGEANT JOHN P. PARKS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JOHN P. PARKS WAS BORN JUNE 21, 1913, IN BEAVERDALE AND WAS THE SON OF THE LATE WILLIAM AND MARY (RONAN) PARKS.(2) STAFF SERGEANT PARKS ATTENDED WINDBER AREA SCHOOLS IN WINDBER.(3) STAFF SERGEANT PARKS HAD TEN BROTHERS AND SISTERS: 20260HB2227PN3749 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EDWARD, WILLIAM, DUANE, STEVEN, LORETTA, BERTHA, AGNES, PATRICK, MARY AND PATRICIA.(4) STAFF SERGEANT PARKS WAS MARRIED TO THERESA (RODEN) PARKS.(5) OUTSIDE OF SERVICE, STAFF SERGEANT PARKS WAS EMPLOYED BY EBENSBURG CENTER, ATTENDED HOLY CHILD JESUS CATHOLIC CHURCH IN WINDBER AND WAS A MEMBER AT AMERICAN LEGION POST 137, FORMERLY HUNTER WEAVER POST 795, VFW AND DAV POST 795.(6) STAFF SERGEANT PARKS ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY ON JANUARY 21, 1941, AND TRAINED AT ARMY CAMPS IN TEXAS, WISCONSIN AND LOUISIANA BEFORE GOING OVERSEAS IN OCTOBER 1941.(7) DURING DEPLOYMENT, STAFF SERGEANT PARKS ACCOMPLISHED A FEAT OF HEROISM WHILE OCCUPYING GUIPAVAS, FRANCE.(8) AFTER DISCOVERING A MACHINE GUN POSITION, APPROXIMATELY 30 YARDS TO ITS FRONT, THE PATROL WAS PREPARING TO WITHDRAW WHEN STAFF SERGEANT PARKS CHARGED THE GERMAN CREW AND SEIZED CONTROL BEFORE THE SIX NAZI GUNNERS COULD FIRE SO MUCH AS A SINGLE SHOT.(9) WITH THE MACHINE GUN KNOCKED OUT, 21 OTHER GERMANS EMERGED FROM FOXHOLES AND HEDGEROWS, SURRENDERING TO STAFF SERGEANT PARKS.(10) STAFF SERGEANT PARKS WAS A RECIPIENT OF THE PURPLE HEART, SILVER STAR AND BRONZE STAR.(11) ACCOMPANYING THE AWARD OF THE SILVER STAR WAS A CITATION TELLING IN DETAIL OF HIS ACTION STATING, "THE GALLANTRY AND INITIATIVE ABOVE AND BEYOND THE DUTY DISPLAYED BY THIS ENLISTED MAN ARE IN KEEPING WITH THE HIGHEST TRADITION OF SERVICE."20260HB2227PN3749 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) STAFF SERGEANT JOHN P. PARKS PASSED AWAY AT HIS HOME IN WINDBER ON JANUARY 21, 1995, SURVIVED BY ONE BROTHER AND TWO SISTERS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 31485, LOCATED ON PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 601 IN PAINT BOROUGH, SOMERSET COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE STAFF SERGEANT JOHN P. PARKS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 12. CAPTAIN WALTER HARRISON SIGAFOOS III MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) WALTER HARRISON SIGAFOOS III WAS BORN AUGUST 29, 1946, IN RICHBORO.(2) CAPTAIN SIGAFOOS LIVED IN A HOME NEAR 800 BUSTLETON PIKE AND ATTENDED THE ADDISVILLE REFORMED CHURCH ON 945 SECOND STREET PIKE, RICHBORO.(3) CAPTAIN SIGAFOOS ENJOYED WATCHING AND PLAYING SPORTS, HUNTING, READING AND SPENDING TIME WITH HIS FAMILY, ESPECIALLY HIS SON.(4) CAPTAIN SIGAFOOS GRADUATED SECOND IN THE COUNCIL ROCK HIGH SCHOOL CLASS OF 1964, LETTERING IN BASEBALL, FOOTBALL AND BASKETBALL, AND WAS APPOINTED TO THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE ACADEMY ON JUNE 29, 1964, GRADUATING AS A SECOND LIEUTENANT IN JUNE 1968, LATER BEING PROMOTED TO FIRST LIEUTENANT ON MAY 12, 1969.(5) ON APRIL 25, 1971, FIRST LIEUTENANT SIGAFOOS LAUNCHED IN AN F-4D ON A COMBAT MISSION OVER LAOS AND, DURING 20260HB2227PN3749 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE MISSION, THE AIRCRAFT WAS SHOT DOWN, CAUSING BOTH FIRST LIEUTENANT SIGAFOOS AND CAPTAIN JEFFREY C. LEMON TO BE DECLARED MISSING IN ACTION.(6) AS OF APRIL 28, 2001, REMAINS HAVE NOT BEEN RECOVERED.(7) THE LOCATION OF LOSS WAS APPROXIMATELY 15 MILES NORTHEAST OF THE CITY OF BAN PHON, THE SAME DISTANCE SOUTHWEST OF THE LAO/SOUTH VIETNAMESE BORDER, AND 54 MILES NORTH-NORTHEAST OF ATTOPEU, SARAVANE PROVINCE, LAOS, AND IT WAS ALSO ROUGHLY 57 MILES WEST-NORTHWEST OF KHAM DUC, SOUTH VIETNAM.(8) WHILE CARRIED IN THE STATUS OF MISSING IN ACTION, THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE PROMOTED FIRST LIEUTENANT SIGAFOOS TO THE RANK OF CAPTAIN.(9) CAPTAIN SIGAFOOS WAS AWARDED THE PURPLE HEART, THE DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS, THE AIR MEDAL FOR MERITORIOUS ACHIEVEMENT AND THE NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL BY THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE FOR HIS SERVICES.(10) CAPTAIN SIGAFOOS ALSO EARNED THE PARACHUTES BADGE AS WELL AS THE SMALL ARMS EXPERT MEDAL DURING HIS TIME.(11) TODAY, CAPTAIN SIGAFOOS IS MEMORIALIZED ON THE COURTS OF THE MISSING AT THE NATIONAL MEMORIAL CEMETERY OF THE PACIFIC. HIS NAME IS ALSO INSCRIBED, ALONG WITH ALL HIS FALLEN COMRADES, ON THE VIETNAM VETERANS MEMORIAL WALL IN WASHINGTON, DC.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 232 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH BUSTLETON PIKE TO THE INTERSECTION WITH ALMSHOUSE ROAD IN NORTHAMPTON TOWNSHIP, BUCKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE CAPTAIN WALTER HARRISON SIGAFOOS III MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.20260HB2227PN3749 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 13. VICTOR E. KIDD MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) VICTOR E. KIDD WAS BORN MARCH 19, 1947, IN BEDFORD COUNTY.(2) PFC KIDD ATTENDED BEDFORD HIGH SCHOOL WHERE HE GRADUATED IN 1965. HE WAS ALSO A 1967 GRADUATE OF THOMPSON BUSINESS COLLEGE IN THE CITY OF YORK, YORK COUNTY.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, HE ENJOYED BASEBALL, HUNTING AND FISHING.(4) PFC KIDD ENTERED MILITARY SERVICE ON SEPTEMBER 18, 1967, AND HELD THE POSITION OF ARMY PRIVATE FIRST CLASS, 4TH BATTALION, 9TH INFANTRY, 25TH DIVISION.(5) PFC VICTOR E. KIDD WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON APRIL 7, 1968, AS A RESULT OF GUNSHOT WOUNDS RECEIVED WHILE ON A COMBAT OPERATION WHEN ENGAGED IN HOSTILE FORCE DURING A FIREFIGHT IN THE TAY NINH PROVINCE, VIETNAM.(6) PFC KIDD RECEIVED THE BRONZE STAR POSTHUMOUSLY FOR MERITORIOUS SERVICE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEYS 3973/42427, CARRYING U.S. ROUTE 30 OVER THE RAYSTOWN BRANCH OF THE JUNIATA RIVER IN SNAKE SPRING TOWNSHIP, BEDFORD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE VICTOR E. KIDD MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 14. CHIEF JEFFORY L. BUCK AND ASSISTANT CHIEF ROBERT R. 20260HB2227PN3749 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHICK, JR., MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) CHIEF JEFFORY L. BUCK WAS BORN NOVEMBER 25, 1965, IN WEST READING.(2) CHIEF BUCK GRADUATED FROM FLEETWOOD AREA HIGH SCHOOL.(3) CHIEF BUCK SERVED WITH THE WALNUTTOWN FIRE COMPANY IN RICHMOND TOWNSHIP, BERKS COUNTY, FOR A TOTAL OF 43 YEARS AND SERVED AS DEPUTY CHIEF FOR 20 YEARS BEFORE BECOMING CHIEF IN 2017.(4) CHIEF BUCK WORKED FOR EAST PENN MANUFACTURING IN LYON STATION FOR 35 YEARS AND ALSO WORKED FOR THE BOYERTOWN FOUNDRY.(5) OUTSIDE OF WORK, CHIEF BUCK ENJOYED SPENDING TIME WITH FAMILY, HUNTING, CAMPING, FISHING AND WOOD CHOPPING.(6) CHIEF BUCK MARRIED JENNIFER M. BADMAN ON APRIL 18, 1992, AND HAD TWO SONS, ROBERT AND CHAD.(7) CHIEF BUCK WAS A MEMBER OF ALSACE MANOR SOCIAL QUARTERS.(8) ASSISTANT CHIEF ROBERT R. SHICK, JR., WAS BORN AUGUST 22, 1969, IN ABINGTON.(9) ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK GRADUATED FROM WILLIAM TENNENT HIGH SCHOOL.(10) ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK SERVED WITH THE WALNUTTOWN FIRE COMPANY IN RICHMOND TOWNSHIP, BERKS COUNTY, FOR MORE THAN THREE DECADES, INCLUDING MULTIPLE YEARS AS ASSISTANT CHIEF.(11) ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK ALSO SERVED FOR A TIME WITH THE VIRGINVILLE FIRE COMPANY IN RICHMOND TOWNSHIP, BERKS 20260HB2227PN3749 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COUNTY.(12) ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK WORKED FOR EAST PENN MANUFACTURING IN LYON STATION FOR 29 YEARS AND FOR VIWINCO WINDOWS AND DOORS OF MORGANTOWN BEGINNING IN 2025.(13) ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK ALSO WORKED FOR DON'S ROOFING IN EGYPT, LEHIGH COUNTY, AND WORKED ON CLEAN-UP #3 AT POCONO RACEWAY FOR 10 YEARS.(14) OUTSIDE OF WORK, ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK ENJOYED COACHING FLEETWOOD YOUTH SOCCER CLUB, CAMPING, FOUR-WHEELING, OFF-ROADING AND SPENDING TIME WITH FAMILY.(15) ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK MARRIED JENNIFER C. HELD ON MARCH 16, 1990, AND HAD TWO CHILDREN, BRETT AND BRITTANY.(16) CHIEF BUCK AND ASSISTANT CHIEF SHICK WERE FATALLY INJURED IN THE LINE OF DUTY ON APRIL 4, 2026, WHILE CONDUCTING A MISSING PERSON SEARCH WITH THE WALNUTTOWN FIRE COMPANY ALONG U.S. ROUTE 222.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF U.S. ROUTE 222 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH DRIES ROAD IN MAIDENCREEK TOWNSHIP TO THE INTERSECTION WITH KEMPSVILLE ROAD IN RICHMOND TOWNSHIP, BERKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE CHIEF JEFFORY L. BUCK AND ASSISTANT CHIEF ROBERT R. SHICK, JR., MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 15. VIETNAM WAR VETERAN SGT. CALVIN G. MAGUIRE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) CALVIN GENE MAGUIRE WAS BORN APRIL 3, 1948, IN ALTOONA TO WILLIAM ROY MAGUIRE AND LAURA MAE RICHARDS 20260HB2227PN3749 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAGUIRE.(2) SGT. MAGUIRE ATTENDED ALTOONA AREA HIGH SCHOOL.(3) SGT. MAGUIRE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY ON FEBRUARY 20, 1967. HIS TOUR IN VIETNAM COMMENCED ON MAY 16, 1969.(4) SGT. MAGUIRE EARNED MULTIPLE DECORATIONS THROUGHOUT HIS SERVICE, INCLUDING THE EXPERT BADGE FOR 11-14 RIFLE, NATIONAL SERVICE DEFENSE MEDAL, PURPLE HEART, ARMY PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION, COMBAT INFANTRYMAN BADGE, VIETNAM SERVICE MEDAL, VIETNAM GALLANTRY CROSS AND VIETNAM CAMPAIGN MEDAL.(5) SGT. MAGUIRE WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON JULY 12, 1969, DURING HIS TOUR IN VIETNAM.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 42872, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 4013 OVER NORFOLK SOUTHERN RAILROAD AND 8TH AVENUE IN THE CITY OF ALTOONA, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE VIETNAM WAR VETERAN SGT. CALVIN G. MAGUIRE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN AN APPROPRIATE SIGN DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 16. TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE BERNARD C. STROHMIER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) BERNARD C. STROHMIER WAS BORN APRIL 9, 1924, IN LORETTO. HE WAS RAISED ON A FARM BETWEEN CHEST SPRINGS AND LORETTO.(2) TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE STROHMIER ATTENDED ST. MONICA CATHOLIC SCHOOL BEFORE JOINING THE ARMY, SERVING AS A 20260HB2227PN3749 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE WITH THE 589TH FIELD ARTILLERY BATTALION, WHICH SERVED AS SUPPORT FOR THE INFANTRY.(3) AFTER ENTERING THE ARMY ON MARCH 13, 1943, AT FORT JACKSON, SOUTH CAROLINA, HE WAS ASSIGNED TO GERMANY IN OCTOBER 1944.(4) WHILE DEFENDING PARKER'S CROSSROADS DURING THE BATTLE OF THE BULGE, TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE STROHMIER WAS TAKEN PRISONER ON DECEMBER 24, 1944. HE WAS PROCESSED THROUGH SEVERAL GERMAN CAMPS, INCLUDING PRUM, GEROLSTEIN AND TRIER. DURING THIS TIME, HE EXPERIENCED EXTREME MALNUTRITION, DEHYDRATION, DYSENTERY AND EXPOSURE TO COLD.(5) TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE STROHMIER WAS LIBERATED BY THE NINTH ARMORED DIVISION AFTER AN ALLIED AIR ATTACK. HE RECEIVED BLOOD TRANSFUSION, PLASMA AND INTRAVENOUS TRANSFUSION OF LIQUIDS IN ENGLAND AND WAS THEN FLOWN TO THE UNITED STATES TO RECEIVE REHABILITATION BEFORE BEING DISCHARGED IN JULY 1946. TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE STROHMIER SPENT OVER ONE YEAR IN TREATMENT AND HAD LOST 75 POUNDS DURING HIS INTERNMENT, WEIGHING 90 POUNDS ON LIBERATION.(6) AFTER RETURNING FROM SERVICE, HE WORKED AS A GUARD AT THE CAMBRIA COUNTY PRISON AND THEN AS A RURAL MAIL CARRIER, RETIRING IN 1979.(7) TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE BERNARD C. STROHMIER PASSED AWAY AT HOME IN LORETTO ON JANUARY 10, 2021.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8546, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 1001 OVER RJ CORMAN RAILROAD IN ALLEGHENY TOWNSHIP, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE TECHNICIAN 5TH GRADE BERNARD C. STROHMIER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO 20260HB2227PN3749 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 17. FIREFIGHTER ADAM E. COLE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ADAM E. COLE WAS BORN MAY 25, 1983, IN GETTYSBURG.(2) MR. COLE WAS A 2002 GRADUATE OF BIGLERVILLE HIGH SCHOOL.(3) MR. COLE WAS A MEMBER OF APPLE CITY FUTURE FARMERS OF AMERICA WHERE HE EARNED SEVERAL DEGREES AND AWARDS, INCLUDING THE GREENHAND DEGREE, STAR GREENHAND, CHAPTER DEGREE, APPLE DEGREE, KEYSTONE DEGREE, AMERICAN DEGREE, PA STATE STAR IN HORTICULTURE, DEKALB AWARD AND THE SOUTH MOUNTAIN ANTIQUE ENGINE ASSOCIATION AGRICULTURE AWARD. MR. COLE WAS ALSO THE FUTURE FARMERS OF AMERICA VICE PRESIDENT FOR TWO YEARS AND CHAPLAIN FOR ONE YEAR.(4) MR. COLE WAS EMPLOYED BY COLE BROTHERS TREE FARM IN BIGLERVILLE AND WAS A CERTIFIED EMERGENCY MEDICAL TECHNICIAN. HE ALSO SERVED AS A VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER AT BUCHANAN VALLEY FIRE COMPANY.(5) OUTSIDE OF WORK, MR. COLE ENJOYED SPENDING TIME WITH HIS FAMILY, INCLUDING HIS PARENTS; HIS SISTER, MEAGAN R. COLE; HIS BROTHER, BROCK D. COLE; MATERNAL GRANDPARENTS, HOWARD AND COLLEEN FLESHMAN OF NEW CHESTER; AND HIS DEAR FRIEND, AMANDA GOLDEN. MR. COLE WAS AN AVID SPORTSMAN AND A DEDICATED WASHINGTON REDSKINS FAN, NASCAR ENTHUSIAST AND MEMBER OF THE BUCHANAN VALLEY ROD AND GUN CLUB WHERE HE SERVED AS ACTIVITIES REPORTER. HE WAS ALSO A MEMBER OF ST. IGNATIUS CATHOLIC CHURCH, ORRTANNA.(6) ADAM E. COLE PASSED AWAY ON OCTOBER 4, 2007, FROM INJURIES RECEIVED IN AN AUTOMOBILE ACCIDENT WHILE RESPONDING 20260HB2227PN3749 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO A FIRE CALL.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 53749, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 234 OVER THE CONEWAGO CREEK IN FRANKLIN TOWNSHIP, ADAMS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE FIREFIGHTER ADAM E. COLE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 18. SGT. ELWOOD EUGENE RUMBAUGH MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ELWOOD EUGENE RUMBAUGH WAS BORN SEPTEMBER 10, 1943, IN WARREN, OHIO.(2) SGT. RUMBAUGH ATTENDED LEAVITTSBURG HIGH SCHOOL IN LEAVITTSBURG, OHIO.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, SGT. RUMBAUGH WAS A RESIDENT OF CAMBRIA COUNTY, PENNSYLVANIA, WHERE HE ENJOYED SPENDING TIME WITH FAMILY AND FRIENDS AND HUNTING.(4) SGT. RUMBAUGH JOINED THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE, WHERE HE SERVED AS FLIGHT ENGINEER CH-53 HELICOPTER, 21ST SPECIAL OPERATIONS SQUADRON STAFF SERGEANT.(5) SGT. RUMBAUGH WAS DECLARED MISSING-IN-ACTION ON MAY 15, 1975, NEAR KOH TANG ISLAND, GULF OF THAILAND.(6) SGT. RUMBAUGH WAS AWARDED THE PURPLE HEART FOR HIS SERVICE DURING VIETNAM ON MAY 15, 1975.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 48742, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 4009 OVER FOX RUN IN NORTHERN CAMBRIA BOROUGH, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SGT. ELWOOD EUGENE RUMBAUGH MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND 20260HB2227PN3749 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 19. SGT. JASON DALE KRIEDLER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JASON DALE KRIEDLER WAS BORN DECEMBER 23, 1929, IN CAMBRIA COUNTY.(2) SGT. KRIEDLER ATTENDED SOUTH FORK HIGH SCHOOL IN CAMBRIA COUNTY.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, SGT. KRIEDLER ENJOYED WORKING ON CARS.(4) SGT. KRIEDLER JOINED THE UNITED STATES ARMY AS AN AUTOMOTIVE MECHANIC, 2ND ECHELON, AS A SERGEANT WITH B COMPANY, 2ND ENGINEER BATTALION, 2ND INFANTRY DIVISION.(5) SGT. KRIEDLER EARNED VARIOUS HONORS AND AWARDS FOR HIS SERVICE, INCLUDING THE COMBAT INFANTRY BADGE, KOREAN SERVICE MEDAL, NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL, REPUBLIC OF KOREA PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION, REPUBLIC OF KOREA WAR SERVICE MEDAL, UNITED NATIONS SERVICE MEDAL AND PURPLE HEART, AND HIS NAME IS DISPLAYED AT THE CAMBRIA COUNTY WAR MEMORIAL.(6) SGT. JASON DALE KRIEDLER WAS REPORTED MISSING-IN-ACTION ON DECEMBER 1, 1950, DURING THE BATTLE OF CHOSIN RESERVOIR IN NORTH KOREA.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8455, CARRYING U.S. ROUTE 219 OVER PALESTINE ROAD IN ADAMS TOWNSHIP, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SGT. JASON DALE KRIEDLER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.20260HB2227PN3749 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 20. FIRE CHIEF JAMES W. CUTCHALL MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) FAYETTEVILLE FIRE CHIEF JAMES W. CUTCHALL WAS TRAGICALLY SHOT AND KILLED ON JULY 2, 1977, WHEN HE ARRIVED AT THE SCENE OF A BLAZE SET BY HIS KILLER, WHO THEN AMBUSHED THE RESPONDING FIREFIGHTERS.(2) CHIEF CUTCHALL WAS ONLY 33 YEARS OF AGE AT THE TIME OF HIS DEATH AND WAS WIDELY REGARDED AS ONE OF THE MOST OUTSTANDING FIRE CHIEFS IN THE NATION.(3) CHIEF CUTCHALL WAS KNOWN FOR USING THE FOLLOWING SAYING IN HIS SPEECHES: "TO BE A VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER AND MAKE AN ERROR IS HUMAN. TO BE A VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER AND WORRY ABOUT THOSE ERRORS IS COMPASSION. TO BE A VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER AND DO SOMETHING ABOUT THOSE ERRORS IS PROFESSIONALISM."(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF STATE ROUTE 1008 IN FAYETTEVILLE, FRANKLIN COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE FIRE CHIEF JAMES W. CUTCHALL MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 21. PENNSYLVANIA AND NATIONAL MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE MEDAL OF HONOR IS OUR NATION'S HIGHEST AWARD FOR VALOR PRESENTED TO VETERANS OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES FOR ACTING WITH CONSPICUOUS GALLANTRY AND INTREPIDITY ABOVE AND BEYOND THE CALL OF DUTY AT THE RISK OF ONE'S LIFE DURING COMBAT WITH AN ENEMY OF THE UNITED STATES.20260HB2227PN3749 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) THE MEDAL OF HONOR IS WIDELY RESPECTED BY THE MILITARY AND PUBLIC ALIKE.(3) THREE HUNDRED TWENTY-ONE MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENTS WERE BORN IN PENNSYLVANIA, 382 RECIPIENTS ENTERED SERVICE FROM PENNSYLVANIA AND 241 RECIPIENTS WERE LAID TO REST IN PENNSYLVANIA.(4) PENNSYLVANIA'S MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENTS SERVED DURING 14 WARS, FROM THE CIVIL WAR TO THE IRAQ WAR, OVER A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 145 YEARS.(5) THE NONPROFIT BEND HEROES FOUNDATION AND THE OREGON LEGISLATURE CREATED A LAW DESIGNATING ALL 451 MILES OF THE BORDER-TO-BORDER US ROUTE 20 IN OREGON AS THE OREGON MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY, A FIRST IN OUR NATION TO HONOR ALL OF A STATE'S MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENTS.(6) THE OREGON LAW PROPOSES A NATIONAL MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY TO BE CREATED ON US ROUTE 20 AT 3,365 MILES IN LENGTH.(7) LEGISLATURES AND GOVERNORS IN ALL 12 STATES ALONG US ROUTE 20 HAVE DESIGNATED THEIR STATE MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAYS COVERING 100% OF THE 3,365-MILE MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY ACROSS AMERICA.(8) ON DECEMBER 17, 2024, US ROUTE 20 WAS DESIGNATED AS THE NATIONAL MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY. BY DESIGNATING US ROUTE 20 AS THE PENNSYLVANIA AND NATIONAL MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY, WE HONOR THE SERVICE AND SACRIFICE OF MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENTS ACROSS THE UNITED STATES AND IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(9) PENNSYLVANIA HAS THE SECOND-HIGHEST NUMBER OF MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENTS OF ANY STATE.(10) A 45-MILE, BORDER-TO-BORDER PENNSYLVANIA AND NATIONAL MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY DESIGNATED ON US ROUTE 20 20260HB2227PN3749 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WOULD HONOR OUR COMMONWEALTH'S AND OUR NATION'S CURRENT AND FUTURE MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENTS AND ADVANCE A 3,365-MILE NATIONAL MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY ACROSS AMERICA BETWEEN THE PACIFIC AND ATLANTIC OCEANS.(11) PENNSYLVANIA DEEPLY APPRECIATES THE SERVICE AND SACRIFICE OF ITS MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENTS AND THE POSITIVE ROLES THEY PLAYED IN THEIR COMMUNITIES FOR MORE THAN 145 YEARS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE ENTIRE PORTION, 45.433 MILES, OF US ROUTE 20 IN PENNSYLVANIA, BEGINNING AT THE PENNSYLVANIA-OHIO STATE LINE AND ENDING AT THE PENNSYLVANIA-NEW YORK STATE LINE, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PENNSYLVANIA AND NATIONAL MEDAL OF HONOR HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS, BROWN WITH WHITE TRIM AND LETTERING, DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN EACH DIRECTION OF THE ROUTE IN EACH HOUSE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT THE ROUTE PASSES THROUGH AND NEAR THE BORDERS OF OHIO AND NEW YORK. THE SIGN SHALL ALSO DISPLAY THE ARMY MEDAL OF HONOR, NAVY MEDAL OF HONOR AND AIR FORCE MEDAL OF HONOR.SECTION 22. LT. COL. KENNETH D. ROYER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) KENNETH D. ROYER WAS BORN OCTOBER 2, 1933, IN CENTRE HALL.(2) LT. COL. ROYER ATTENDED EAST PENNS VALLEY HIGH SCHOOL. AFTER HIGH SCHOOL, HE ATTENDED A BUSINESS SCHOOL IN HARRISBURG.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, LT. COL. ROYER WAS A MEMBER OF THE MILLHEIM LIONS CLUB, THE SALEM UNITED CHURCH OF CHRIST IN 20260HB2227PN3749 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SPRING MILLS, THE ELKS CLUB IN BOALSBURG AND AN ACTIVE MEMBER OF THE AMERICAN LEGION KEYSTONE POST #444 IN MILLHEIM WHERE HE HELD THE POSITIONS OF COMMANDER, DUTY COMMANDER, ADJUTANT AND CHAPLAIN. LT. COL. ROYER WAS A SUPPORTER OF HIS GRANDCHILDREN AND GREAT-GRANDCHILDREN'S HIGH SCHOOL ACTIVITIES. HE ENJOYED BOWLING, PLAYING POOL, ATTENDING PENN STATE FOOTBALL GAMES WITH HIS WIFE AND FAMILY AND ATTENDING GRANGE FAIR WHERE THEY HAD A FAMILY TENT SINCE 1973.(4) LT. COL. ROYER JOINED THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE, SERVING AS A LIEUTENANT COLONEL, B-52 RADAR NAVIGATOR, AT MANY BASES IN THE UNITED STATES AND OVERSEAS.(5) LT. COL. ROYER RECEIVED THE CITATION TO ACCOMPANY THE AWARD OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS - B-52 RADAR NAVIGATOR OVER SOUTHEAST ASIA ON APRIL 4, 1972.(6) WHILE FLYING A CRITICAL BOMBING MISSION AGAINST A HIGH-PRIORITY TARGET, LT. COL. ROYER'S AIRCRAFT ENCOUNTERED HOSTILE FIRE IMMEDIATELY AFTER MAKING A SUCCESSFUL WEAPONS RELEASE. DURING THE ATTACK, LT. COL. ROYER CONSTANTLY KEPT HIS PILOT ADVISED OF MISSILE DETONATIONS AND OTHER AIRCRAFT POSITIONS, THEREBY DRAMATICALLY ASSISTING IN THE SAFE RECOVERY OF ALL AIRCRAFT AND CREWS.(7) LIEUTENANT COLONEL KENNETH D. ROYER PASSED AWAY ON OCTOBER 11, 2024, AT MOUNT NITTANY HOSPITAL, STATE COLLEGE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 9258, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 45 OVER ELK CREEK IN MILLHEIM BOROUGH, CENTRE COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE LT. COL. KENNETH D. ROYER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO 20260HB2227PN3749 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 23. CORPORAL ROBERT L. HAINES MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) CORPORAL ROBERT L. HAINES WAS BORN FEBRUARY 12, 1946, IN SOMERSET COUNTY.(2) CORPORAL HAINES GRADUATED FROM FORBES HIGH SCHOOL IN KANTNER IN 1964. SHORTLY THEREAFTER, HE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS AND SERVED WITH COMPANY B, 1ST BATTALION, 9TH MARINE REGIMENT, 3RD MARINE DIVISION.(3) ON JULY 2, 1967, DURING OPERATION BUFFALO NEAR THE DEMILITARIZED ZONE, CORPORAL HAINES WAS SERVING NEAR QUANG TRI IN THE REPUBLIC OF VIETNAM WHEN HIS UNIT CAME UNDER INTENSE ENEMY FIRE. AS HE MOVED FORWARD IN AN EFFORT TO LINK HIS SQUAD WITH ANOTHER PLATOON, THE UNIT BECAME PINNED DOWN AMID THE HEAVY FIGHTING.(4) DURING THE ENGAGEMENT, CORPORAL HAINES WAS STRUCK BY FRAGMENTATION FROM AN ARTILLERY ROUND, SUSTAINING FATAL WOUNDS TO THE CHEST.(5) THE BATTLE PROVED SO FIERCE THAT IT TOOK FIVE BATTALIONS AND THREE DAYS TO SECURE THE AREA. THE COST OF THE FIGHTING THAT DAY WAS SEVERE, WITH THE 1ST BATTALION, 9TH MARINE REGIMENT SUFFERING 84 MARINES KILLED IN ACTION, 166 WOUNDED AND ONE REPORTED MISSING.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEYS 31407 AND 31408, CARRYING U.S. ROUTE 219 OVER U.S. ROUTE 30 IN JENNER TOWNSHIP, SOMERSET COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE CORPORAL ROBERT L. HAINES MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO 20260HB2227PN3749 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 24. WEEDVILLE WORLD WAR II MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) BOTH PENNSYLVANIANS AND THE NATION ARE INDEBTED TO THE VETERANS OF JAY TOWNSHIP (WEEDVILLE), ELK COUNTY, FOR THEIR SERVICE AND SACRIFICE IN WORLD WAR II.(2) SEVENTY-SIX JAY TOWNSHIP RESIDENTS SERVED IN WORLD WAR II.(3) GIVING RECOGNITION TO THE SERVICE MEN AND WOMEN OF JAY TOWNSHIP (WEEDVILLE), ELK COUNTY, IS FITTING TO MEMORIALIZE AND HONOR THOSE WHO BRAVELY FOUGHT FOR AND SERVED THEIR COUNTRY DURING WORLD WAR II.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 52616, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 555 OVER KERSEY RUN IN JAY TOWNSHIP, ELK COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE WEEDVILLE WORLD WAR II MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 25. PRIVATE ROBERT M. PITTMAN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ROBERT M. PITTMAN WAS BORN JUNE 19, 1921, IN GREEN TOWNSHIP, INDIANA COUNTY.(2) ROBERT ATTENDED COMMODORE HIGH SCHOOL, WHERE HE GRADUATED ON MAY 20, 1940.(3) PRIVATE ROBERT M. PITTMAN WAS AWARDED VARIOUS HONORS THROUGHOUT HIS SERVICE IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY, INCLUDING THE WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL, PURPLE HEART, AMERICAN 20260HB2227PN3749 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CAMPAIGN MEDAL, ARMY PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION AND THE ARMY GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL.(4) PRIVATE ROBERT M. PITTMAN WAS ABOARD THE USS DORCHESTER WHEN IT WAS TORPEDOED NEAR GREENLAND, AND HIS REMAINS WERE LOST AT SEA.(5) THE SHIP IS THE SHIP OF THE "FOUR CHAPLAINS," WHO GAVE AWAY THEIR LIFE JACKETS THAT OTHERS MIGHT LIVE.(6) PRIVATE ROBERT M. PITTMAN'S NAME IS LISTED ON THE TABLETS OF THE MISSING OF THE EAST COAST MEMORIAL, NEW YORK, NY.(7) PRIVATE ROBERT M. PITTMAN WAS REPORTED MISSING IN ACTION AND ULTIMATELY DECLARED DEAD ON FEBRUARY 3, 1943.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 19186, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 580 OVER CUSH CUSHION CREEK IN GREEN TOWNSHIP, INDIANA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PRIVATE ROBERT M. PITTMAN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 26. USMCWR MARY A. LIDWELL MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS MARY A. LIDWELL WAS BORN OCTOBER 11, 1923, IN AMSBRY AND ATTENDED GALLITZIN HIGH SCHOOL IN 1942.(2) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LIDWELL VOLUNTEERED FOR THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS IN 1943 AND BECAME A MEMBER OF THE WOMEN'S AVIATION RESERVE SQUADRON UNTIL SHE LEFT THE SERVICE IN 1946. THE WOMEN'S AVIATION RESERVE SQUADRON, LOCATED IN EL TORO, CALIFORNIA, AT THE TIME, WAS TASKED WITH REPAIRING 20260HB2227PN3749 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DAMAGED AIRPLANES DURING WORLD WAR II. FOR HER EXEMPLARY WORK, PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LIDWELL WAS AWARDED THE CONGRESSIONAL ROSIE THE RIVETER MEDAL.(3) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LIDWELL, AT 101 YEARS OF AGE, CONTINUES TO BE AN ACTIVE MEMBER OF HER COMMUNITY IN ASHVILLE BOROUGH BY VOLUNTEERING HER TIME AT HER CHURCH, BEING INVOLVED IN COMMUNITY PROJECTS, FUNDRAISING FOR CHARITIES AND WORKING WITH THE VFW LADIES AUXILIARY. SHE ALSO SERVED AS THE ASHVILLE BOROUGH SECRETARY AND TREASURER FOR MANY YEARS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8387, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 53 OVER PATTY'S RUN IN GALLITZIN TOWNSHIP, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE USMCWR MARY A. LIDWELL MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 27. BROWN BROTHERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE BROWN BROTHERS, STEWART, HOMER, GRANT, DELL AND EVERETT, GREW UP IN NICKTOWN, PENNSYLVANIA, AND ALL ATTENDED THE GRIFFITH SCHOOL IN NICKTOWN.(2) STEWART BROWN WAS BORN IN 1906 AND OPERATED A GARAGE IN NICKTOWN. HE LATER LIVED IN MICHIGAN AND HAD ONE CHILD. HE ENLISTED IN THE ARMY IN 1943, SERVED AS AN ARMY TECHNICAL SERGEANT AND PASSED AWAY IN 1961.(3) HOMER BROWN WAS BORN IN 1913 AND WORKED AS A MECHANIC. HE LIVED NEAR PITTSBURGH, PENNSYLVANIA, AND HAD TWO CHILDREN. HE ENTERED THE ARMY IN 1943, SERVED AS AN ARMY ARTILLERY SERGEANT IN ITALY AND PASSED AWAY IN 1960.20260HB2227PN3749 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) GRANT BROWN WAS BORN IN 1914 AND WORKED ON A FAMILY FARM AND AS A MECHANIC. HE LIVED IN OHIO AND WAS MARRIED TWICE. HE ENTERED THE ARMY IN 1942, SERVED AS AN ARMY SERGEANT IN FRANCE AND PASSED AWAY IN 1967.(5) DELL BROWN WAS BORN IN 1917 AND WORKED AS A LUMBERMAN, IN SHAFT AND SLOPE MINING AND FOR BELL TELEPHONE. HE LIVED IN NICKTOWN, MARRIED AND HAD SIX CHILDREN. HE ENTERED THE ARMY IN 1942, SERVED AS AN ARMY TECHNICAL SERGEANT IN THE MEDICAL CORPS IN ITALY, SICILY AND NORTH AFRICA AND PASSED AWAY IN 1987.(6) EVERETT BROWN WAS BORN IN 1918 AND WORKED AS A MACHINIST FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA RAILROAD. HE LIVED NEAR PITTSBURGH, MARRIED AND HAD FOUR CHILDREN. HE ENTERED THE ARMY IN 1943, SERVED AS AN ARMY AIR FORCE SERGEANT IN ENGLAND AND PASSED AWAY IN 1970.(7) COLLECTIVELY, THE FIVE BROWN BROTHERS SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY DURING WORLD WAR II ACROSS MULTIPLE THEATERS, INCLUDING ITALY, FRANCE, ENGLAND, SICILY AND NORTH AFRICA.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8514, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 271 OVER NORTH BRANCH BLACKLICK CREEK IN BARR TOWNSHIP, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE BROWN BROTHERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 28. JOSEPH KAY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JOSEPH W. "JOEY" KAY WAS BORN MAY 8, 1989, IN 20260HB2227PN3749 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DOYLESTOWN.(2) MR. KAY WAS A 2007 GRADUATE OF CENTRAL BUCKS EAST HIGH SCHOOL. MR. KAY CONTINUED HIS EDUCATION AT PENNSYLVANIA COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY WHILE PURSUING A CAREER AS AN ELECTRICIAN.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, MR. KAY WAS DEEPLY CONNECTED TO THE BUCKS COUNTY COMMUNITY AND WAS ALWAYS WILLING TO LEND A HELPING HAND TO NEIGHBORS, FRIENDS AND LOCAL ORGANIZATIONS. HE WAS AN ACCOMPLISHED RACE CAR DRIVER, COMPETING IN THE MID-ATLANTIC RACING SPRINT SERIES AND AT ACTION TRACK USA, WHERE HE EARNED THE RESPECT AND ADMIRATION OF FELLOW COMPETITORS AND FANS FOR BOTH HIS TALENT AND SPORTSMANSHIP.(4) MR. KAY'S LIFE WAS ROOTED IN SERVICE TO HIS COMMUNITY. CONTINUING A FAMILY LEGACY OF VOLUNTEERISM AND PUBLIC SERVICE, HE PROUDLY SERVED WITH THE PLUMSTEADVILLE VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY, WHERE HE DEMONSTRATED DEDICATION, SELFLESSNESS AND A WILLINGNESS TO HELP OTHERS WHENEVER NEEDED. IN RECOGNITION OF HIS COMMITMENT AND CONTRIBUTIONS, HE WAS NAMED FIREFIGHTER OF THE YEAR IN 2012. ADDITIONALLY, MR. KAY WORKED ALONGSIDE HIS FATHER IN THE FAMILY BUSINESS AND SERVED AS VICE PRESIDENT OF JOHN W. KAY ELECTRICAL CONTRACTORS IN RICHBORO.(5) MR. KAY IS SURVIVED BY HIS LOVING WIFE OF THREE YEARS, RACHEL; PARENTS, JOHN W. AND SUSAN (QUIGLEY) KAY; IN-LAWS, PAM AND STEVE SALERA; BROTHER-IN-LAW, PETER SALERA; AND GRANDFATHER, JACK KAY. HE IS ALSO MOURNED BY HIS THREE DEVOTED SISTERS AND THEIR SPOUSES: SHANNON A. RITTENHOUSE, LAUREN A. ETTER AND MEGAN K. MCBRIDE AND EIGHT CHERISHED NIECES AND NEPHEWS: CARSON, CALLUM AND SLOANE RITTENHOUSE; LANDON, GARRETT AND CHARLOTTE ETTER; AND BRIDGET AND SEAN 20260HB2227PN3749 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MCBRIDE. HE IS PRECEDED IN DEATH BY HIS LOVING GRANDPARENTS ARLINE AND DONALD QUIGLEY AND ELIZABETH KAY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 611 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH OLD EASTON ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION WITH KELLERS CHURCH ROAD IN PLUMSTEAD TOWNSHIP, BUCKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE JOSEPH KAY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 29. PFC STANLEY J. LASSAK MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) STANLEY J. LASSAK WAS BORN JANUARY 11, 1921, IN CRESSON.(2) PFC LASSAK RECEIVED EDUCATION UP UNTIL THE EIGHTH GRADE BEFORE GOING TO WORK ON THE FAMILY FARM.(3) OUTSIDE OF WORK, PFC LASSAK ENJOYED SPENDING TIME WITH FAMILY AND GARDENING.(4) PFC LASSAK ENTERED THE UNITED STATES ARMY IN SEPTEMBER 1942. DURING HIS SERVICE, HE BECAME A PRIVATE FIRST CLASS WITH THE MEDICAL DETACHMENT OF THE 22ND INFANTRY REGIMENT AND SERVED UNTIL SEPTEMBER 1945.(5) THROUGHOUT HIS SERVICE, PFC LASSAK EARNED SEVERAL AWARDS AND DECORATIONS, INCLUDING THE PURPLE HEART, BRONZE STAR MEDAL, EUROPEAN-AFRICAN-MIDDLE EASTERN CAMPAIGN MEDAL AND THE GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL.(6) ON DECEMBER 5, 1993, PFC LASSAK WAS STRUCK AND KILLED BY A CAR ON LEVEL ROAD IN CRESSON TOWNSHIP IN CAMBRIA COUNTY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8612, 20260HB2227PN3749 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CARRYING U.S. ROUTE 22 IN CRESSON TOWNSHIP, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC STANLEY J. LASSAK MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 30. J. DOYLE CORMAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) DESIGNATION.--THE SECTIONS OF U.S. ROUTES 22 AND 322 BEGINNING AT U.S. ROUTE 322, SEGMENT 772/OFFSET 1795, IN CENTRE COUNTY AND ENDING AT U.S. ROUTE 22, SEGMENT 573/OFFSET 2625 IN MIFFLIN COUNTY ARE DESIGNATED AS THE J. DOYLE CORMAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(B) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 31. SERGEANT ADAM HARTSWICK HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) SERGEANT ADAM HARTSWICK PRESERVED A LONGSTANDING FAMILY TRADITION OF MILITARY SERVICE BY PURSUING A PATH IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY AFTER GRADUATING FROM STATE COLLEGE AREA HIGH SCHOOL IN STATE COLLEGE IN 2009.(2) SERGEANT HARTSWICK BEGAN HIS SERVICE TO OTHERS AS A VOLUNTEER WITH CENTRE LIFELINK EMS.(3) AFTER GRADUATING FROM HIGH SCHOOL, SERGEANT HARTSWICK COMPLETED HIS MEDICAL TRAINING AT FORT SAM HOUSTON IN TEXAS, WHICH PAVED HIS WAY TO BECOMING AN ARMY SENIOR COMBAT MEDIC.(4) SERGEANT HARTSWICK WAS DEPLOYED TO AFGHANISTAN IN DECEMBER 2012.(5) IN MAY 2013, WHILE RUSHING TO THE SCENE OF AN 20260HB2227PN3749 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EXPLOSION THAT KILLED FOUR UNITED STATES SERVICE MEMBERS IN THE KANDAHAR PROVINCE, SERGEANT HARTSWICK TRAGICALLY LOST BOTH OF HIS LEGS AFTER STEPPING ON AN IMPROVISED EXPLOSIVE DEVICE AFTER TENDING TO A WOUNDED SOLDIER.(6) AFTER LOSING BOTH OF HIS LEGS, SERGEANT HARTSWICK'S COMPOSURE REMAINED INTACT AS HE WAS ABLE TO INSTRUCT HIS PLATOON LEADER ON HOW TO ADMINISTER HIS AID.(7) WHILE HE WAS RESTING IN THE HOSPITAL AFTER SURGERY, A THREE-STAR GENERAL PROMOTED ADAM HARTSWICK TO SERGEANT.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE SECTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 45, FROM THE INTERSECTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 26, SEGMENT 0140, OFFSET 0000, IN PINE GROVE MILLS, CENTRE COUNTY, TO U.S. BUSINESS ROUTE 322, SEGMENT 0240, OFFSET 0000, IN BOALSBURG, CENTRE COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SERGEANT ADAM HARTSWICK HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 32. BRIAN KEEFER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) MR. KEEFER WAS BORN SEPTEMBER 26, 1971, IN INDIAN HEAD.(2) MR. KEEFER WAS THE FOREMAN AND SUPERINTENDENT OF GULISEK CONSTRUCTION.(3) WHILE WORKING ON A BRIDGE REHABILITATION PROJECT IN WESTMORELAND COUNTY, MR. KEEFER WAS STRUCK BY A LARGE CONSTRUCTION TRUCK ALONG A CLOSED STRETCH OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 993 IN NORTH HUNTINGDON TOWNSHIP, OUTSIDE OF IRWIN.(4) MR. KEEFER SUCCUMBED TO INJURIES HE SUSTAINED FROM THE ACCIDENT ON THE MORNING OF JULY 8, 2025.20260HB2227PN3749 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 36355, ON THAT PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 993 OVER BRUSH CREEK IN NORTH HUNTINGDON TOWNSHIP, WESTMORELAND COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE BRIAN KEEFER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 33. RICH RIDGWAY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) RICHARD "RICH" RIDGWAY WAS BORN IN BLOOMSBURG, COLUMBIA COUNTY, ON SEPTEMBER 2, 1944.(2) HE GRADUATED FROM SOUTHERN COLUMBIA AREA HIGH SCHOOL AND SERVED HIS COUNTRY WITH HONOR AND DISTINCTION AS A MEMBER OF THE PENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARD.(3) MR. RIDGWAY ATTENDED THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY BEFORE RELOCATING TO NEW YORK CITY WHERE HE BEGAN HIS CAREER IN THE FOOD SERVICE INDUSTRY.(4) HE RETURNED TO BLOOMSBURG IN 1980 AND OPENED RIDGWAY'S RESTAURANT, WHICH HE AND HIS WIFE, MARY, OPERATED FOR 26 YEARS.(5) ACTIVE IN HIS COMMUNITY, MR. RIDGWAY WAS ELECTED AND SERVED AS A SCOTT TOWNSHIP SUPERVISOR AND COLUMBIA COUNTY COMMISSIONER FOR 12 YEARS.(6) HE WAS A LIFE MEMBER OF BENEVOLENT AND PROTECTIVE ORDER OF ELKS BLOOMSBURG LODGE NO. 436 AND A MEMBER OF VALLEY OF BLOOMSBURG AMERICAN LEGION POST NO. 273.(7) MR. RIDGWAY WAS A REVERED AND RESPECTED MEMBER OF HIS COMMUNITY, AND HIS LOSS IS FELT BY THE MANY INDIVIDUALS THAT ADMIRED AND LOVED HIM.20260HB2227PN3749 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 11 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH CENTRAL ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION WITH LOWS ROAD IN BLOOMSBURG, COLUMBIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE RICH RIDGWAY MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 34. REPEALS ARE AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE SECTION 20.(2) SECTION 15 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 17, 2016 (P.L.342, NO.46), IS REPEALED.(3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE SECTION 21.(4) SECTION 16 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 30, 2021 (P.L.339, NO.64), IS REPEALED.(5) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (6) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE SECTION 26.(6) SECTION 3 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 30, 2025 (P.L.36, NO.17), IS REPEALED.(7) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (8) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE SECTION 30.(8) THE ACT OF DECEMBER 15, 1999 (P.L.925, NO.62), IS REPEALED.(9) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (10) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE SECTION 31.(10) SECTION 13 OF THE ACT OF JULY 2, 2014 (P.L.929, NO.103), IS REPEALED.Section 2 35. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2227PN3749 - 39 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829